Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

249.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

249.020

to

249.100

or hinders the carrying out of any of the provisions of those sections shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any fine imposed for a violation of subsection (4) of KRS

249.070

may be recovered in the county in which the nursery is situated or the county to which the nursery stock is shipped.

History.

42f-4, 200, 1923, 1925a-4, 1925a-9: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 180, § 11; 1960, ch. 225, § 14; 1980, ch. 188, § 231, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 433, § 4, effective April 10, 1990; 1996, ch. 142, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 2022 ch. 131, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

249.991.
Penalties. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 11, § 9; 1990, ch. 433, § 5, effective April 10, 1990; repealed by 2022 ch. 131, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.